Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.136

Commercial trailer.

"Commercial trailer" means a trailer that is principally used to transport commodities, merchandise, produce, freight, or animals.

[ 2010 c 161 s 110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.